Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.aff
FLAG long
SFX c3 éder èderons éder is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 éger ègerons éger is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 égler èglerons égler is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 égner ègnerons égner is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 égrer ègrerons égrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 éguer èguerons éguer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 éler èlerons éler is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 émer èmerons émer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 éner ènerons éner is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 éper èperons éper is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 équer èquerons équer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 érer èrerons érer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 éser èserons éser is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 éter èterons éter is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 étrer ètrerons étrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 évrer èvrerons évrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 éyer èyerons éyer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c3 er erez er is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerez ébrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 écer ècerez écer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 écher ècherez écher is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 écrer ècrerez écrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 éder èderez éder is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 éger ègerez éger is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 égler èglerez égler is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 égner ègnerez égner is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 égrer ègrerez égrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 éguer èguerez éguer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 éler èlerez éler is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 émer èmerez émer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 éner ènerez éner is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 éper èperez éper is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 équer èquerez équer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 érer èrerez érer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 éser èserez éser is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 éter èterez éter is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 étrer ètrerez étrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 évrer èvrerez évrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 éyer èyerez éyer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c3 er eront/s' er is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 ébrer èbreront/s' ébrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 écer èceront/s' écer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 écher ècheront/s' écher is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 écrer ècreront/s' écrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 éder èderont/s' éder is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 éger ègeront/s' éger is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 égler ègleront/s' égler is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 égner ègneront/s' égner is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 égrer ègreront/s' égrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 éguer ègueront/s' éguer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 éler èleront/s' éler is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 émer èmeront/s' émer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 éner èneront/s' éner is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 éper èperont/s' éper is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 équer èqueront/s' équer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 érer èreront/s' érer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 éser èseront/s' éser is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 éter èteront/s' éter is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 étrer ètreront/s' étrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 évrer èvreront/s' évrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 éyer èyeront/s' éyer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c3 er erais/m' er is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerais/m' ébrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 écer ècerais/m' écer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 écher ècherais/m' écher is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 écrer ècrerais/m' écrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 éder èderais/m' éder is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 éger ègerais/m' éger is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 égler èglerais/m' égler is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 égner ègnerais/m' égner is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 égrer ègrerais/m' égrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 éguer èguerais/m' éguer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 éler èlerais/m' éler is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 émer èmerais/m' émer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 éner ènerais/m' éner is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 éper èperais/m' éper is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 équer èquerais/m' équer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 érer èrerais/m' érer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 éser èserais/m' éser is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 éter èterais/m' éter is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 étrer ètrerais/m' étrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 évrer èvrerais/m' évrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 éyer èyerais/m' éyer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c3 er erais/t' er is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerais/t' ébrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 écer ècerais/t' écer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 écher ècherais/t' écher is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 écrer ècrerais/t' écrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 éder èderais/t' éder is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 éger ègerais/t' éger is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 égler èglerais/t' égler is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 égner ègnerais/t' égner is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 égrer ègrerais/t' égrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 éguer èguerais/t' éguer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 éler èlerais/t' éler is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 émer èmerais/t' émer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 éner ènerais/t' éner is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 éper èperais/t' éper is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 équer èquerais/t' équer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 érer èrerais/t' érer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 éser èserais/t' éser is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 éter èterais/t' éter is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 étrer ètrerais/t' étrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 évrer èvrerais/t' évrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 éyer èyerais/t' éyer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c3 er erait/s' er is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerait/s' ébrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 écer ècerait/s' écer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 écher ècherait/s' écher is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 écrer ècrerait/s' écrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 éder èderait/s' éder is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 éger ègerait/s' éger is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 égler èglerait/s' égler is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 égner ègnerait/s' égner is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 égrer ègrerait/s' égrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 éguer èguerait/s' éguer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 éler èlerait/s' éler is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 émer èmerait/s' émer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 éner ènerait/s' éner is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 éper èperait/s' éper is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 équer èquerait/s' équer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 érer èrerait/s' érer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 éser èserait/s' éser is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 éter èterait/s' éter is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 étrer ètrerait/s' étrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 évrer èvrerait/s' évrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 éyer èyerait/s' éyer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c3 er erions er is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerions ébrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 écer ècerions écer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 écher ècherions écher is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 écrer ècrerions écrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 éder èderions éder is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 éger ègerions éger is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 égler èglerions égler is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 égner ègnerions égner is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 égrer ègrerions égrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 éguer èguerions éguer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 éler èlerions éler is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 émer èmerions émer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 éner ènerions éner is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 éper èperions éper is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 équer èquerions équer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 érer èrerions érer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 éser èserions éser is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 éter èterions éter is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 étrer ètrerions étrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 évrer èvrerions évrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 éyer èyerions éyer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c3 er eriez er is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 ébrer èbreriez ébrer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 écer èceriez écer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 écher ècheriez écher is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 écrer ècreriez écrer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 éder èderiez éder is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 éger ègeriez éger is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 égler ègleriez égler is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 égner ègneriez égner is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 égrer ègreriez égrer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 éguer ègueriez éguer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 éler èleriez éler is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 émer èmeriez émer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 éner èneriez éner is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 éper èperiez éper is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 équer èqueriez équer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 érer èreriez érer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 éser èseriez éser is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 éter èteriez éter is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 étrer ètreriez étrer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 évrer èvreriez évrer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 éyer èyeriez éyer is:cond is:2pl
SFX c3 er eraient/s' er is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 ébrer èbreraient/s' ébrer is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 écer èceraient/s' écer is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 écher ècheraient/s' écher is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 écrer ècreraient/s' écrer is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 éder èderaient/s' éder is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 éger ègeraient/s' éger is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 égler ègleraient/s' égler is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 égner ègneraient/s' égner is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 égrer ègreraient/s' égrer is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 éguer ègueraient/s' éguer is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 éler èleraient/s' éler is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 émer èmeraient/s' émer is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 éner èneraient/s' éner is:cond is:3pl
SFX c3 éper èperaient/s' éper is:cond is:3pl
